Illinois, session 104th, SB1072.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 16-101 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/16-101)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 16-101)7    Sec. 16-101. Creation of system. Effective July 1, 1939, 8there is created the the "Teachers' Retirement System of the 9State of Illinois" for the purpose of providing retirement 10annuities and other benefits for teachers, annuitants and 11beneficiaries. All of its business shall be transacted, its 12funds invested, and its assets held in such name.13(Source: P.A. 83-1440.)